src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - áljahl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AHL_STEM_2

     áljahl+V+Imm+Pres: áljalga
     áljahl+V+Simp+Pres: áljalgang
     áljahl+V+Dir+Past: áljalgan
     áljahl+V+NonFact: áljal.ang
     áljahl+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: áljalgang
     áljahl+V+Pres+Hab: áljalganggang
     áljahl+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: áljalgangang
     áljahl+V+Dir+Past+Hab: áljalgiinii
     áljahl+V+Interr+Past+Hab: áljalgaangaa
     áljahl+V+Indir+Past+Hab: áljalgaangaan
     áljahl+V+Interr+Near+Fut: áljalang k̲asaʼáa
     áljahl+V+Near+Fut: áljalang k̲asaʼáang
     áljahl+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: áljalang k̲asaasdláa
     áljahl+V+VNear+Fut: áljalang k̲asaasdláang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: áljalgangʼwaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: áljalgangʼwaang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: áljalgangʼwaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: áljalgangʼanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: áljalgangʼangang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: áljalang k̲asaaʼáng
     áljahl+V+Neg+Near+Fut: áljalang k̲asaaʼánggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: áljalang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     áljahl+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: áljalang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: áljalgangʼangʼwaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: áljalgangʼangʼwaang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: áljalgangʼangʼwaa.ang
